Arkansas, session 2025, SB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-501(b), concerning the limits of
compensation payable to an injured employee for disability other than
permanent partial disability under the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6)(A) For a disability or death which results from an injury
occurring on and after January 1, 2026 the maximum weekly benefit payable
shall be seventy percent (70%) of the average weekly wage of the injured
employee.
(B) The maximum annual salary total of weekly benefit
payments to an injured employee under subdivision (b)(6)(A) of this section
is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-9-501(d), concerning the limits of
compensation payable to an employee for permanent partial disability under
the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) The permanent partial disability rate for compensation
*ANS191*
03-20-2025 14:10:27 ANS191

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB285
payable to an employee for permanent partial disability which results from an
injury occurring on or after July 1, 1986, shall not exceed sixty-six and
two-thirds percent (66⅔%) of the employee's average weekly wage, with a
twenty-dollar-per-week minimum, subject to a maximum of one hundred fifty-
four dollars ($154). However, if the employee's total disability rate for
the injury would be two hundred five dollars and thirty-five cents ($205.35)
per week or greater, then the maximum permanent partial disability rate shall
be seventy-five percent (75%) of the employee's total disability rate.
(B) The permanent partial disability rate for compensation
payable to an employee for permanent partial disability which results from an
injury occurring on or after January 1, 2026, shall not exceed seventy-five
percent (75%) of the amount calculated under subdivision (b)(6)(A) of this
section.
(2)(A) The permanent partial disability rate provided herein
shall also apply to scheduled permanent injuries except those resulting in
amputation or permanent total loss of use of a member.
(B) The permanent partial disability rate for amputation
or permanent total loss of use of a member shall be the same as the
employee's total disability rate as specified in subsection (b) of this
section, subject to the maximum as set forth in subdivision (b)(4) of this
section.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those
injuries which occur on or after January 1, 1996.

/s/J. Payton











03-20-2025 14:10:27 ANS191